Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.41.010

Retirement and pension systems for code cities having a population of more than twenty thousand.

A code city having a population of more than twenty thousand inhabitants, or having been classed theretofore as a city of the first class may exercise all of the powers relating to retirement and pension systems for employees as authorized by RCW 35A.11.020 and by chapter 41.28 RCW in accordance with the procedures prescribed therein and subject to the limitations and penalties thereof.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.41.010.]